src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/N-1E-vääqrr_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - vääʹrr: # Noun 1E-stem 'daktryl, mountain/vaara' - full paradigm
# 
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Nom: vääʹrr
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Gen: vääʹr
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Acc: vääʹr
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Ill: värra
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Loc: vääʹrest
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Com: vaaʹrin
     vääʹrr+N+Ess: vääʹrren
     vääʹrr+N+Par: vääʹrred
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Abe: [vääʹrtaa, vääʹrtää]
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Nom: vääʹr
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Gen: vaaʹri
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Acc: vaaʹrid
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Ill: vaaʹrid
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Loc: vaaʹrin
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Com: vaaʹrivuiʹm
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Abe: [vaaʹritaa, vaaʹritää]

##
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: väärram
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: väärrad
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: vääʹrres
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: vääʹrrem
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: vääʹrred
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: vääʹrrez
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: väärran
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: väärad
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: vääʹres
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: vääʹrren
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: vääʹred
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: vääʹrez
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: väärran
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: väärad
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: vääʹres
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: vääʹrren
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: vääʹred
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: vääʹrez
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: värrsan
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: värrsad
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: värrses
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: värrseen
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: värrseed
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: värrseez
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: väʹrstan
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: väʹrstad
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: väʹrstes
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: väʹrsteen
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: väʹrsteed
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: väʹrsteez
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: vaaʹrinan
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2: vaaʹrinad
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Com+PxSg3: vaaʹrines
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Com+PxPl1: vaaʹrineen
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Com+PxPl2: vaaʹrineed
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Com+PxPl3: vaaʹrineez
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg1: väärrantää
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg2: vääradtää
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg3: vääʹrestää
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl1: vääʹrrentää
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl2: vääʹredtää
     vääʹrr+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl3: vääʹreztää
     vääʹrr+N+Ess+PxSg1: väʹrrnan
     vääʹrr+N+Ess+PxSg2: väʹrrnad
     vääʹrr+N+Ess+PxSg3: väʹrrnes
     vääʹrr+N+Ess+PxPl1: väʹrrneen
     vääʹrr+N+Ess+PxPl2: väʹrrneed
     vääʹrr+N+Ess+PxPl3: väʹrrneez
#
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: väärran
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: väärad
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: vääʹres
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: vääʹrren
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: vääʹred
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: vääʹrez
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: vaaʹrään
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: vaaʹrääd
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: vaaʹrees
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: vaaʹreen
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: vaaʹreed
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: vaaʹreez
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: vaaʹrään
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: vaaʹrääd
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: vaaʹrees
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: vaaʹreen
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: vaaʹreed
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: vaaʹreez
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: vaaʹrään
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: vaaʹrääd
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: vaaʹrees
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: vaaʹreen
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: vaaʹreed
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: vaaʹreez
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: vaaʹrinan
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: vaaʹrinad
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: vaaʹrines
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: vaaʹrineen
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: vaaʹrineed
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: vaaʹrineez
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Com+PxSg1: vaaʹräänvuiʹm
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Com+PxSg2: vaaʹräädvuiʹm
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Com+PxSg3: vaaʹreesvuiʹm
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Com+PxPl1: vaaʹreenvuiʹm
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Com+PxPl2: vaaʹreedvuiʹm
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Com+PxPl3: vaaʹreezvuiʹm
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg1: vaaʹrääntää
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg2: vaaʹräädtää
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg3: vaaʹreestää
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl1: vaaʹreentää
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl2: vaaʹreedtää
     vääʹrr+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl3: vaaʹreeztää
#
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: vääraž
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen: väära
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc: väära
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill: väärʼže
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: väärast
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: väärain
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe: [väärataa, vääratää]
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Ess: väärʼžen
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Par: väärʼžed
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom: väära
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen: väärai
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc: vääraid
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill: vääraid
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc: väärain
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com: vääraivuiʹm
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe: [vääraitaa, vääraitää]
# according to Pekka 1991: 163--164
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: vääržam
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: vääržad
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: vääržes
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: vääržeem
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: vääržeed
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: vääržeez
     
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: vääržan
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: vääržad
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: vääržes
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: vääržeen
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: vääržeed
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: vääržeez
     
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: vääržan
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: vääržad
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: vääržes
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: vääržeen
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: vääržeed
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: vääržeez

     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: vääržasan
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: vääržasad
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: vääržasas
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: vääržeʹsen
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: vääržeʹsed
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: vääržeʹsez
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: värstan
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: värstad
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: värstes
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: värsteen
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: värsteed
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: värsteez
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: väärainan
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2: väärainad
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxSg3: vääraines
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxPl1: vääraineen
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxPl2: vääraineed
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxPl3: vääraineez
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg1: väärʼžantää
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg2: väärʼžadtää
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg3: väärʼžestää
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl1: väärʼžeentää
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl2: väärʼžeedtää
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl3: väärʼžeeztää

#     
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: väärʼžan
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: väärʼžad
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: väärʼžes
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: väärʼžeen
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: väärʼžeed
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: väärʼžeez
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: väärään
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: väärääd
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: väärees
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: vääreen
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: vääreed
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: vääreez
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: väärään
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: väärääd
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: väärees
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: vääreen
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: vääreed
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: vääreez
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: väärään
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: väärääd
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: väärees
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: vääreen
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: vääreed
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: vääreez
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: väärainan
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: väärainad
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: vääraines
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: vääraineen
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: vääraineed
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: vääraineez
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxSg1: vääräänvuiʹm
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxSg2: vääräädvuiʹm
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxSg3: vääreesvuiʹm
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxPl1: vääreenvuiʹm
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxPl2: vääreedvuiʹm
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxPl3: vääreezvuiʹm
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg1: väärääntää
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg2: vääräädtää
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg3: vääreestää
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl1: vääreentää
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl2: vääreedtää
     vääʹrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl3: vääreeztää
